Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3220
Board; minutes; records; monthly publication of expenditures; publication fee; public inspection.

The board shall cause to be kept accurate minutes of its meetings and accurate records and books of account, conforming to approved methods of bookkeeping prescribed by the Auditor of Public Accounts, clearly setting out and reflecting the entire operation, management and business of the district. It shall be the duty of the board to prepare and publish each month in a newspaper or newspapers which provide general coverage of the district, a detailed list of all expenditures of the district for the preceding month. Any newspaper utilized by the district shall publish such list of expenditures for a fee no greater than the rate provided by law for the publication of proceedings of county boards. Such publication shall set forth the amount of each claim approved, the purpose of the claim, and the name of the claimant. Such books and records shall be kept at the principal office of the district or at such other regularly maintained office or offices of the district as shall be designated by the board, with due regard to the convenience of the district, its customers, and electors. Such books and records shall at reasonable business hours be open to public inspection.

Laws 1969, c. 9, § 20, p. 114;

Laws 1975, LB 404, § 2.